Montana, session 2025, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 23-2-409, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-2-409. Allocation of user fees -- expenditure of Smith River corridor enhancement account.
(1) All money collected as recreational and commercial user fees for floating and camping on the Smith River
waterway pursuant to 23-2-408 must be deposited in the state treasury in the Smith River corridor
enhancement account in the state special revenue fund to the credit of the department.
(2) (a) The following portions of recreational and commercial user fees deposited in the Smith
River corridor enhancement account must be used for the purposes in subsection (2)(b):
(i) $50 of each commercial outfitter client fee;
(ii) all revenue from the sale of super permit lottery chances;
(iii) all revenue from sales of a resident-only $5 bonus point and a nonresident $50 $125 bonus
point; and
(iv) 5% of other float fee revenue, except for the nonrefundable permit application fee.
(b) The sum of the funds described in subsection (2)(a) must be expended to:
(i) protect and enhance the integrity of the natural and scenic beauty of the Smith River waterway
and its recreational, fisheries, and wildlife values through the lease or acquisition of property, including lease or
acquisition of partial interests in property by the department within the Smith River corridor;
(ii) pursue projects that serve to protect, enhance, and restore fisheries habitat, streambank
stabilization, erosion control, and recreational values within the Smith River corridor, including Smith River
tributaries; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 257
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 257
(iii) pursue projects that serve to maintain and enhance instream flows for recognized recreational
and aquatic ecosystem values in the Smith River corridor.
(3) All other funds in the Smith River corridor enhancement account may be used to manage,
operate, and maintain the Smith River corridor."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 257
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 257, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 257
INTRODUCED BY L. SMITH, S. NOVAK, J. KASSMIER, G. LAMMERS, P. FLOWERS, E. KERR-
CARPENTER, C. POPE
AN ACT REVISING THE COST FOR NONRESIDENT SMITH RIVER BONUS POINTS; AMENDING SECTION
23-2-409, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”